Utah statutes.
78B-5-510.   Assertion of individual's rights by spouse, dependent, or other
authorized person.
If an individual fails to select property entitled to be claimed as exempt or
to object to a levy on the property or to assert any other right under this
part, the spouse or a dependent of the individual or any other authorized
person may make the claim or objection or assert the rights provided by this
part.
